en: Croissant filled with jam
de: Mit Konfitüre gefüllte Croissants
fi: Hillolla täytetyt voisarvet, Hillolla täytetyt kroisantit, Hillolla täytetyt croissantit
fr: Croissants fourrés à la confiture, Croissant fourré à la confiture
hr: Kroasan punjen marmeladom
it: Cornetti farciti con confettura
nl: Croissants met jam

en: Croissant with almonds from bakery
fr: Croissant aux amandes artisanal
nl: Croissants met amandelen van de bakker

en: Croissant with almonds, Almond croissant
fr: Croissants aux amandes

en: Chouquettes, Sugar coated chou pastry
de: Chouquettes
fr: Chouquettes, Chouquette
hr: Chouquettes
ja: シューケット
nl: Chouquette-soesjes

en: Apple turnovers, Apple croissants
de: Apfeltaschen
fr: Chaussons aux pommes
he: שוסון או פום
hr: Promet jabuka
it: Appelflap
ja: ショーソン・オ・ポム
lb: Äppeltäsch
nl: Appelflappen
pl: Appelflap

en: Chocolate croissant
de: Schokoladen-Croissants
es: Croissant de chocolate
fi: Suklaavoisarvi, Suklaakroisantti, Suklaacroissantit
fr: Pains au chocolat, Chocolatines
hr: Čokoladni kroasan
it: Croissant al cioccolato
nl: Chocolade croissants, Chocolade croissant
tr: Çikolatalı kruvasan, Çikolatalı kruasan, Çikolatalı ay çöreği, Çikolatalı ayçöreği

fr: Pains au chocolat à l'huile de tournesol
en: Chocolate croissants with sunflower oil
de: Schokoladen-Croissants mit Sonnenblumenöl
es: Croissants de chocolate con aceite de girasol
hr: Čokoladni kroasani sa suncokretovim uljem
it: Cornetti al cioccolato con olio di girasole
nl: Chocolade croissants met zonnebloemolie

en: Chocolate croissant prepacked
de: Schokoladen-Croissant verpackt
es: Croissant de chocolate envasado
fi: Suklaavoisarvi valmiiksi pakattu
fr: Pain au chocolat préemballé
hr: Čokoladni kroasan unaprijed upakiran
it: Croissant al cioccolato confezionato
nl: Chocolade croissants voorverpakt
tr: Paketlenmiş çikolatalı kruvasan

en: Franzbrötchen
xx: Franzbrötchen
de: Franzbrötchen

en: Milk bread rolls
de: Milchbrötchen, Milchbrotrollen
es: Panes de leche
fr: Pains au lait, pain au lait
hr: Peciva s mlijekom
it: Panini al latte
ja: パン・オ・レ
nl: Melkbroodjes
pt: Pães de leite

en: Plain milk bread rolls
fi: Pelkät maitosämpylät
fr: Pains au lait natures
hr: Obične mliječne žemlice

en: Milk roll from bakery
fr: Pain au lait artisanal

en: Milk bread rolls with chocolate, Milk roll filled with chocolate drops
fr: Pains au lait au chocolat, pains au lait aux pépites de chocolat, Pain au lait aux pépites de chocolat
hr: Mliječni kruh s čokoladom
nl: Melkbroodjes met chocola

en: Vienna bread, Brioche bread, Brioche breads
fr: Pains briochés, Pains viennois, Baguettes viennoises
hr: Bečki kruh
it: Pane di Brioche
nl: Viennoiserie brood, Briochebrood

en: Brioches, Brioche
ar: بريوش
az: Brioş
bg: Бриоши
ca: Brioix, Brioixos
cy: Brioche
de: Brioche
el: Τσουρέκι
eo: brioĉo
es: brioche
fi: Briossi
fr: brioches, Brioche
gl: Brioche
he: בריוש
hr: Brioši
hy: Բրիոշ
id: Brioche
io: Briocho
it: brioche
ja: ブリオッシュ
ka: ბრიოში
ko: 브리오슈
mk: Бриош
nb: brioche
nl: brioches, Brioche
pl: brioche
pt: brioche
ru: Бриошь
sr: Бриош
sv: brioche
tr: Brioche
uk: Бріош
zh: 布里歐

fr: Brioches tressées
ja: ブリオッシュ・トレッセ

en: Brioche from bakery
fr: Brioche de boulangerie traditionnelle

en: Brioche prepacked
fr: Brioche préemballée

en: Brioche king cakes
es: Roscón, roscon, Roscón de Reyes
fr: Couronnes des rois, Couronne des rois, Brioches des rois, Brioche des rois, Galettes des rois briochées, Galette des rois briochée, Gâteaux des rois, gâteau des rois
pt: Bolo Rei, Bolo-rei, bolo de reis, bolo de Natal

en: Classic brioche king cakes with candied fruits, Christmas brioche with candied fruits
fr: Couronnes des rois classiques aux fruits confits, Couronne de Noël aux fruits confits, Brioche de Noël aux fruits confits